Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. General Administrative Provisions.

Sec. 44.88.160.
Findings of the authority. [Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.88.165.
Delinquent loans.

The authority shall adopt regulations to describe the circumstances under which it will discontinue purchasing loans from a financial institution because of excessive delinquencies among the loans previously purchased by the authority from the financial institution. In adopting the regulations, the authority must consider the authority’s delinquency experience with loans it purchased from all financial institutions. The authority may include in the regulations other remedies it considers appropriate as alternatives to the discontinuance of purchasing loans from the financial institution.

History.

(§ 42 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 55 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 15 ch 123 SLA 1990)

Sec. 44.88.170.
Purchase of project and leases.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, nothing in this chapter prevents the inclusion in a lease or other agreement relating to a project of a provision granting the right to purchase the project, or to renew or extend the lease or agreement, upon the terms and conditions that may be provided for in the lease or agreement.

A lease with respect to a project may provide for two or more lessees with the legal relationship between themselves and the authority which the authority may approve, including without limitation, provisions to the effect that the obligations of the lessees under the lease for payment of rental or otherwise between themselves and the authority are several, joint, or joint and several and that the lessees lease the project as tenants in common, or otherwise.

The authority, without first obtaining legislative approval, may not enter into a gas supply contract with a natural gas producer to provide natural gas to Interior Alaska as a primary market unless the contract is for the benefit of a natural gas liquefaction or distribution utility that is owned by the authority or a subsidiary of the authority and the contract is for the natural gas producer to provide the utility, and only the utility, with a natural gas supply that the utility uses to serve customers in Interior Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am §§ 5, 6 ch 39 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.170. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “Except as provided in (c) of this section, nothing in this chapter” for “Nothing in this chapter” at the beginning, and made a stylistic change; added (c).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning
ch. 39, SLA 2015 (HB 105), see 2015 House Journal 188 — 192.

Sec. 44.88.172.
Economic development account.

The economic development account is established in the revolving fund. The economic development account consists of money or assets appropriated, loaned, or transferred to the authority for deposit in the account and other money or assets deposited in the account by the authority. While money is on deposit in the economic development account, the money may be used to finance, acquire, manage, and operate development projects that the authority intends to own and operate or to provide development project financing for development projects the authority does not intend to own and operate. In this subsection,

“operate” includes operation directly by the authority, by an agent of the authority, or by a person as determined under an agreement between the authority and other owners of the development project;

“own” includes ownership by the authority of all or a percentage of a development project or all or a percentage of the shares of a corporation or membership in a limited liability company for which the development project is the sole asset of the corporation or limited liability company.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

The authority shall adopt regulations to implement this section. The regulations may include provisions for the application process, application fees, interest rates, other charges and fees, terms, conditions, security, and other requirements for development projects the authority undertakes or development project financing the authority provides.

History.

(§ 8 ch 162 SLA 1984; am §§ 35, 36 ch 42 SLA 1987; am §§ 16, 23 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 69 SLA 2010; am § 11 ch 7 SLA 2011; am §§ 8, 9 ch 26 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For legislative authorization for the authority to own and operate or finance under this section the Bokan-Dotson Ridge rare earth element project’s surface complex, see sec. 5, ch. 20, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization for the authority to own and operate or finance under this section infrastructure for the Niblack project, including the mineral processing mill, associated dock, and loading and related infrastructure facilities at the Gravina Island Industrial Complex, as well as infrastructure at the project site on Prince of Wales Island, see sec. 6, ch. 20, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For development finance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 9, 2010, in (a), substituted “In this subsection,” for “The term”, added “, or by a person as determined under an agreement between the authority and other owners of the development project; “own” includes ownership by the authority of all or a percentage of a development project” and added paragraph (1) and (2) designations.

The 2011 amendment, effective May 7, 2011, rewrote (a)(2) which read, “‘own’ includes ownership by the authority of all or a percentage of a development project.”

The 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, in the introductory language in (a), deleted “only” following “money may be used” and inserted “or to provide development project financing for development projects the authority does not intend to own and operate” at the end of the second sentence; added (d).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 69, SLA 2010 (SB 300), proposing amendments to subsection (a) of this section to modernize the Authority’s lending practices, including changes to encourage joint financing of development projects with other parties, see 2010 Senate Journal 1661 — 1663.

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 26, SLA 2013 (SB 23) see 2013 Senate Journal 40 — 42.

Sec. 44.88.173.
Finance plan.

Before approving a project financed under AS

44.88.172

, the authority shall prepare a finance plan. The finance plan must include an estimate of the total cost of the project, and a description of the sources of money that will be used to finance the total cost of the project. The finance plan must also include an estimate of the operational costs of the completed project, as well as a description of the source of the money that is to be used to pay the operational costs.

The authority shall give preference to a project that does not require financial assistance from the state. If the authority determines that a project requires state financial assistance, and if the authority further determines that it is desirable to finance the project, the authority shall recommend a method of financing that minimizes cost to the state. A finance plan required under (a) of this section must identify the method of financing that minimizes the cost to the state.

The authority shall submit a finance plan prepared under this section to the state bond committee, the governor, and the legislature before issuing bonds or otherwise incurring debt for the project. If a project requires financial assistance from the state, the state financial assistance must be available before bonds are issued for the project.

History.

(§ 8 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For development finance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 5.

Sec. 44.88.174.
Regional resource advisory council.

Within 30 days after the authority adopts a resolution certifying that a project in the unorganized borough is eligible for financing under AS

44.88.172

, the governor shall appoint a Regional Resource Advisory Council in the area of the state where the project is to be located and for which a regional housing authority has been established under AS

18.55.996

. The purpose of a council is to assist the authority in reviewing a project that has been proposed for development in its area of the state.

A Regional Resource Advisory Council consists of five members registered to vote in the region. The governor shall appoint the members to reflect the economic and geographic diversity of the region. Council members serve three-year terms at the pleasure of the governor, except that the initial members may be appointed for less than three years so that the term of at least one of the members expires each year. The governor shall appoint a chairperson who shall call meetings as required and preside over the deliberations of the council. A majority of the council constitutes a quorum for conducting the business of the council.

Members of a Regional Resource Advisory Council do not receive compensation for their services on the council, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for state boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 44.88.175.
Requirements prior to approval of projects. [Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.88.176.
Hearing to consider proposed project. [Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.88.177.
Operation of projects.

If a project is financed under AS

44.88.172

, the authority shall solicit the review and advice of the Regional Resource Advisory Council or governing body in the area in which a project is located before the execution of contracts, agreements, resolutions, or other matters that directly concern the development, maintenance, and operation of a project.

History.

(§ 8 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 44.88.178.
Creation of subsidiaries.

The authority may create one or more subsidiary corporations for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, operating, or financing a project financed under AS

44.88.172

. A subsidiary corporation created under this section may be incorporated under AS

10.20.146

—

10.20.166

. The authority may transfer assets of the authority to a subsidiary created under this section. A subsidiary created under this section may borrow money and issue bonds as evidence of that borrowing, and has all the powers of the authority that the authority grants to it. Unless otherwise provided by the authority, the debts, liabilities, and obligations of a subsidiary corporation created under this section are not the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the authority.

History.

(§ 12 ch 7 SLA 2011)

Sec. 44.88.180.
Conflicts of interest.

A member of the authority may not vote on a resolution of the authority relating to a lease or contract to be entered into by the authority under this chapter if the member is a party to the lease or contract or has a direct ownership or equity interest in a firm, partnership, corporation, or association that may be a party to the contract or lease. A resolution of the authority that is approved by a majority of the members who are not barred from voting under this subsection is a valid action of the authority for all purposes.

[Repealed, § 82 ch 41 SLA 2009.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 56 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 82 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.180. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, repealed (b).

Sec. 44.88.190.
Operation of certain statutes excepted.

The authority may not be considered or constitute (1) a political subdivision of the state as the term is used in AS

37.10.085

, (2) a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state as the terms are used in AS 29, or (3) except as provided in AS

44.88.205

, a state agency as the term is used in AS 37, but for all other purposes the authority constitutes a political subdivision and an instrumentality of the state as provided in this chapter.

The funds, income, or receipts of the authority may not be considered or constitute money of the state, nor may real property in which the authority has an interest be considered land owned in fee by the state or to which the state may become entitled or in any way land belonging to the state, or state land referred to in Art. VIII of the Alaska Constitution.

A loan participation purchased or financed by the authority is exempt from the provisions of AS

45.45.010

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 67 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 51 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.190. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.200.
Annual audit.

The authority shall have its financial records audited annually by the legislative auditor or by a certified public accountant approved by the legislative auditor.
The legislative auditor may prescribe the form and content of the financial records of the authority and shall have access to these records at any time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.200. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.205.
Compliance with executive budget act; authority finances.

The operating budget of the authority is subject to AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

To further ensure effective budgetary decision making by the legislature, the authority shall

annually review the authority’s assets to determine whether assets of the authority exceed an amount required to fulfill the purposes of the authority as defined in this chapter; in making its review, the authority shall determine whether, and to what extent, assets in excess of the amount required to fulfill the purposes of the authority during at least the next fiscal year are available without

breaching any agreement entered into by the authority;

materially impairing the operations or financial integrity of the authority; or

materially affecting the ability of the authority to fulfill the authority’s purposes set out in AS

44.88.070

; and

make available to the legislature by January 10 of each year a complete accounting of all assets of the authority and a report of the review and determination made under (1) of this subsection; the accounting shall be audited by the auditor who conducts the audit required by AS

44.88.200

and must include a full description of all loan interest and principal payments and program receipts, including

loan commitment fees received by or accrued to the authority during the preceding fiscal year; and

all income earned on assets of the authority during that period.

History.

(§ 68 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 3 ch 12 SLA 1991; am § 8 ch 111 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.205. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.210.
Reports and publications.

By January 10 of each year, the authority shall publish a report for distribution to the governor, legislature, and the public. The authority shall notify the legislature that the report is available. The report shall be written in easily understandable language. The report must include a financial statement audited by an independent outside auditor, a statement of the authority’s investments under this chapter including an appraisal of the investments at market value, a comparison of the authority’s performance with the goals of the authority and the levels of bonding and investment activities anticipated in the previous year’s report under (b) of this section, and any other information the members of the authority believe would be of interest to the governor, the legislature, and the public. The annual income statement and balance sheet of the authority shall be published in at least one newspaper in each judicial district. The authority may also publish other reports it considers desirable to carry out its purpose.

The authority must include in its annual report under (a) of this section

an estimate of the investment activity of the authority under this chapter for the following 12-month period; and

an estimate of the amount of bonds to be issued during the following 12-month period.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 69 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 102 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.210. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority to report quarterly, until June 30, 2025, to the legislature concerning the Interior energy project and to provide a briefing on the Interior energy project to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, see secs. 13 - 14, ch. 39, SLA 2015.

Sec. 44.88.212.
Fees charged by authority; prepayments.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

The commitment fee for a loan commitment by the authority may not exceed two percent of the principal amount of the loan.

The authority may not limit, or charge a fee or penalty for, prepayment of a loan after five years from the inception of the loan.

History.

(§ 34 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 38 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.88.085

. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For conduit revenue bond program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 1.

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

For taxable loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 3.

Sec. 44.88.215.
Confidentiality of records and information.

In order to promote the purposes of this chapter, unless the records or information were a matter of public record before submittal to the authority, the following records and information shall be kept confidential if the person supplying the records or information or the project, bond, loan, or guarantee applicant or borrower requests confidentiality and makes an adequate showing to the executive director of the authority that the records or information are

income tax returns;

financial statements, profit-and-loss statements, and cash flow projections, except the information required by the authority to calculate debt service coverage on the loan;

financial business plans;

credit reports from consumer reporting agencies and other credit information obtained from banks, creditors, or other credit reporting entities;

trade secrets, including confidential proprietary information and confidential information about products, pricing, or manufacturing or business processes;

appraisals, except the name of the appraiser, the date of the appraisal, and the fair market value determined for the property appraised;

market surveys and marketing strategy information; or

any information required to be kept confidential by a federal law or regulation or by state law.

Information compiled by the authority from information described in (a) of this section shall be kept confidential unless disclosure is authorized by the person supplying the information and by the project, bond, loan, or guarantee applicant or borrower.

The records and information that the executive director of the authority determines to be confidential under (a) or (b) of this section are not public records under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a legislator from reviewing information otherwise confidential under this section if the legislator has a valid legislative purpose for reviewing the information and if the legislator agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the information.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1998; am §§ 5, 6 ch 71 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.220

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 12, 2010, rewrote the introductory language of (a), which read, “In order to promote the purposes of AS 44.88, unless the records were a matter of public record before submittal to the authority, the following records, files, and information shall be kept confidential upon the request of the person supplying the information or upon the request of the project, bond, loan, or guarantee applicant or borrower:”; in (a)(5), added “, including confidential proprietary information and confidential information about products, pricing, or manufacturing or business processes” following “trade secrets”; in (a)(7), substituted “or” for “and” at the end; rewrote (c), which read, “The information that is determined to be confidential under (a) or (b) of this section is not a public record under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 71, SLA 2010 (HB 90), amending (a) and (c) of this section, see 2009 House Journal 95 — 97.

Sec. 44.88.220.
[Renumbered as AS 44.88.900.]

Secs. 44.88.300 — 44.88.370.
Export assistance. [Repealed, § 21 ch 109 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 44.88.380.
Personal liability.

An officer, employee, or agent of the authority may not be held personally liable in a civil action for damages for an act done or omitted in good faith while performing the functions of office, employment, or agency under this chapter.

History.

(§ 42 ch 42 SLA 1987)

Sec. 44.88.390.
Export insurance account. [Repealed, § 21 ch 109 SLA 1998.]